District of Columbia statutes.
3-606

Powers.

(a)

The Commission shall have the power to make, amend, carry out, and enforce such rules as it deems necessary for and likely to be effective in governing the events and procedures within its jurisdiction as well as all participants in such events and procedures. The Commission shall conduct its rulemaking and enforcement and other functions under the provisions of Chapter 5 of Title 2 where appropriate, and shall promulgate rules within 60 days of its establishment.

(b)

The Commission shall have the power to issue permits and licenses to all participants, and for all events covered by this chapter. If the Commission, by rule, regulation, or order requires a license for a person or event covered by this chapter, no person shall hold, conduct, or be a participant in any such boxing, wrestling, or martial arts contest, match, or exhibition without a permit or license from the Commission. The Commission is authorized, in its sole judgment and discretion, to assign to those with proper permits, dates on which boxing, wrestling, and martial arts contests, matches, and exhibitions may be held, and no person shall hold any boxing, wrestling, or martial arts contest, match, or exhibition on any dates unless specifically authorized to do so by the Commission. No permit as described in this section shall be issued to any person unless such person agrees to accord to the Commission the right to examine the books of account and other records of such person relative to the boxing, wrestling, or martial arts contest, match, or exhibition for which such permit is issued, and such permit shall so state on its face. Licenses and permits may be revoked or suspended by the Commission for violation of any rule, regulation, or order of the Commission or for violation of any rule, regulation, or order of the District of Columbia or for other cause. The contested case provisions of §§ 2-509 and 2-510 shall be followed in revocation and suspension proceedings.

(c)

The Commission shall have the power to collect fees for permits and licensure in an amount and in a manner that is reasonable in light of costs of administration and like charges imposed by other jurisdictions for similar licenses and that it shall determine with the approval of the Mayor. Any monies received but not expended at the end of a fiscal year shall lapse into the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia.

(d)

The Commission shall have the power to require all licensees and permittees to execute and file with the Commission a bond in an amount to be determined by the Commission before such license or permit may be granted. Said bond shall be approved as to form and sufficiency of sureties by the Mayor, or by such official as he may designate. In case of default in such performance, recovery may be had on such bond in the same manner as other penalties are recovered by law.

(e)

The Commission shall have the power to establish standards for, and the permitted circumstances of, rental or ownership of the premises where events within the jurisdiction of the Commission will or may occur. The Commission may also establish standards for all equipment of the Commission. The Commission may also provide for the inspection of such premises and equipment.

(f)

The Commission shall have the power to assess nonlicense fees and fines payable to the Commission under this chapter or the Commission rules, and to require reports and manifests to be furnished the Commission relating to nonlicense fees.

(g)

The Commission shall have the power to employ such personnel as is necessary to carry out this chapter.

(h)

Each member of the Commission shall have the power to administer oaths and affirmations and examine witnesses concerning any matters within the jurisdiction of the Commission. The Commission shall be vested with power to issue subpoenas as to matters within its jurisdiction and enforce the same in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

(i)

The Commission shall have the power to investigate all operations, occurrences, events, and persons within its jurisdiction, and any suspected violation of its orders or rules, or of this chapter.

(j)

The Commission shall have the power to issue such orders (including suspensions of licenses and permits) to persons within its jurisdiction, which reasonably will:

(1)

Assure compliance with this chapter, or the Commission’s rules or orders;

(2)

Prevent influence of organized crime in boxing and wrestling in the District of Columbia; or

(3)

Encourage boxing and wrestling in the District.

(k)

The Commission shall have the power, subject to the approval of the Mayor, to make or engage in contracts, agreements, or cooperative work with other District of Columbia agencies, or commissions or agencies of other states or cities governing boxing or wrestling, or private persons, when such contracts, agreements, or cooperative work will reasonably and lawfully carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(l)

The Commission shall have the power to establish other rules and regulations concerning events and persons within its jurisdiction as it deems appropriate to encourage boxing and wrestling in the District of Columbia and for other purposes consistent with this chapter.

(m)

(1)

The Commission shall, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue rules to establish standards for the operation of gymnasiums and other facilities used in the training of boxers, wrestlers, kickboxers, and practitioners of martial arts, shall implement these rules, and shall license all facilities as well as inspect all facilities and equipment subject to this subsection.

(2)

The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved. Nothing in this section shall affect any requirements imposed upon the Mayor by subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

Oct. 8, 1975, D.C. Law 1-20, § 7, 23 DCR 1810
Feb. 26, 1976, D.C. Law 1-50, § 3, 22 DCR 5127
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3205(ll), (mm), 25 DCR 5740
Sept. 29, 1988, D.C. Law 7-169, § 2(c), 35 DCR 5749
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 9035, 58 DCR 6226
D.C. Law 19-21, in subsec. (c), added the second sentence.
1973 Ed., § 2-1236.
1981 Ed., § 2-606.
This section is referenced in § 1-636.02, § 3-608, and § 47-2853.04.
Regulated non-health related occupations and professions, see § 47-2853.04.
Effective date provisions, see § 1-636.02.